Utah statutes.
78B-7-203.   Hearing.
(1) If an ex parte order is granted, the court shall schedule a hearing within
20 days after the ex parte determination.  If an ex parte order is denied, the
court, upon the request of the petitioner, shall schedule a hearing within 20
days after the ex parte determination.
(2)  The petition, ex parte child protective order, and notice of hearing
shall be served on the respondent, the minor's parent or guardian, and, if
appointed, the guardian ad litem.  The notice shall contain:
(a)  the name and address of the person to whom it is directed;
(b)  the date, time, and place of the hearing;
(c)  the name of the minor on whose behalf a petition is being brought; and
(d)  a statement that a person is entitled to have an attorney present at the
hearing.
(3)  The court shall provide an opportunity for any person having relevant
knowledge to present evidence or information.  The court may hear statements
by counsel.
(4)  An agent of the division served with a subpoena in compliance with the
Utah Rules of Civil Procedure shall testify in accordance with the Utah Rules
of Evidence.
(5)  If the court determines, based on a preponderance of the evidence, that
the minor is being abused or is in imminent danger of being abused, the court
shall enter a child protective order.  With the exception of the provisions of
Section 78A-6-323, a child protective order does not constitute an
adjudication of abuse, neglect, or dependency under Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part
3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings.
